Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF904.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 HF 904 (2) 91 th/ns/md H.F. 904 Section 1. Section 321.266, subsections 2 and 3, Code 2025, 1 are amended to read as follows: 2 2. The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting 3 in injury to or death of any person, or total property damage 4 to an apparent extent of one five thousand five hundred dollars 5 or more , shall , within seventy-two hours after the accident, 6 forward a written report of the accident to the department 7 within seventy-two hours after the accident . However, such 8 report is not required when if the accident is investigated by 9 a law enforcement agency. 10 3. Every law enforcement officer who, in the regular course 11 of duty, investigates a motor vehicle accident of which report 12 must be made as required in subsections 1 and 2 , either at 13 the time of and at the scene of the accident or thereafter 14 by interviewing participants or witnesses shall , within 15 twenty-four hours after completing such investigation, forward 16 a written report of such accident to the department. 17 Sec. 2. Section 321A.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 18 to read as follows: 19 1. The department shall, immediately or within sixty days 20 after the receipt of a report of a motor vehicle accident 21 within this state which has resulted in bodily injury or death 22 to any person, or property damage to the property of any 23 one person in the amount of one five thousand five hundred 24 dollars or more, suspend the license of each operator and all 25 registrations of each owner of a motor vehicle in any manner 26 involved in the accident, and if the operator is a nonresident 27 the privilege of operating a motor vehicle within this state, 28 and if the owner is a nonresident the privilege of the use 29 within this state of any motor vehicle owned by the owner, 30 unless the operator or owner or both shall deposit security 31 in a sum which shall be sufficient in the judgment of the 32 department to satisfy any judgment or judgments for damages 33 resulting from the accident as may be recovered against the 34 operator or owner; provided notice of the suspension shall be 35 -1- HF 904 (2) 91 th/ns/md 1/ 2 H.F. 904 sent by the department to the operator and owner not less than 1 ten days prior to the effective date of the suspension and 2 shall state the amount required as security. 3 Sec. 3. Section 321I.11, Code 2025, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 321I.11 Accident reports. 6 If an all-terrain vehicle is involved in an accident 7 resulting in injury or death to anyone any person, or property 8 damage amounting to one five thousand five hundred dollars or 9 more, either the operator or someone acting for the operator 10 shall immediately notify the county sheriff or another law 11 enforcement agency in the state. If the accident occurred on 12 public land, public ice, or a designated riding trail under the 13 jurisdiction of the commission, the operator shall file with 14 the commission a report of the accident, within seventy-two 15 hours, containing information as the commission may require. 16 All other accidents shall be reported as required under section 17 321.266 . 18 -2- HF 904 (2) 91 th/ns/md 2/ 2